District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
40 act may be cited as the “Housing Development Growth Amendment Act of 2025”.
41
42 Title I. SOCIAL HOUSING DEVELOPMENT
1

43 Sec. 101. DEFINITIONS.
44 For the purposes of this chapter, the term:
45 (1) “Area Median Income” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 2(1) of
46 the Housing Production Trust Fund Act of 1988, effective March 16, 1989 (D.C. Law 7-202;
47 D.C. Official Code § 42-2801(1)).
48 (2) “Bonds” means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or other evidence of
49 financial indebtedness of the Office authorized to be issued under the provisions of this chapter.
50 (3) “Extremely low-income” means a household income equal to, or less than, 30% of the
51 area median income.
52 (4) “Fair market value” means the average, unsubsidized rental rate a reasonable person
53 could expect to pay for a comparable dwelling unit when considering the age, condition, and
54 location of similar properties.
55 (5) “Low-income” means a household income equal to between 51% and 80% of the area
56 median income.
57 (6) “Mixed-income” means a property that includes tenants with a range of household
58 incomes including extremely low-, very low-, low-, and above low-income levels.
59 (7) “Mixed-use” shall mean a multi-family residential development that includes space
60 for commercial or institutional purposes in accordance with zoning regulations set forth by the
61 Office of Zoning.
62 (8) “Net-zero emissions” means all energy is produced on-site, and to the degree that off-
63 site energy production is necessary, it is provided via contracts for electricity produced from
64 renewable sources and no energy may be produced from combustion or other sources that emit
65 greenhouse gases.
2

66 (9) “Operating costs” means any costs associated with maintaining a Social Housing
67 Development including management expenses, maintenance, utilities, and associated services.
68 (10) “Permanently affordable” means a tenant’s rent, in perpetuity, will not exceed 30%
69 of tenant household income if, at the time a tenant signs an initial lease, they qualify as
70 extremely low-, very low-, or low-income relative to area median income.
71 (11) “Personal mobility device” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 50-
72 2201.02(13).
73 (12) “Real property” means land titled in the District or in which the District has a
74 controlling interest and includes all structures of a permanent character erected thereon or affixed
75 thereto, any natural resources located thereon or thereunder, all riparian rights attached thereto,
76 or any air space located above or below the property or any street or alley under the jurisdiction
77 of the Mayor.
78 (13) “Rent” means money owed to occupy a unit in a social housing development,
79 including:
80 (A) Money to be paid directly by a tenant, and
81 (B) Funding associated with housing voucher programs operated by the District or
82 Federal government.
83 (14) “Restorative justice” means a process of allowing tenants or property managers, or
84 management sub-contractors, who are causing harm in the community to take responsibility,
85 reconcile with impacted parties, and address root causes of the harm with the goal of restoring all
86 parties to the level of trust and cooperation prior to the harm.
87 (15) “Social housing development” means real property that:
3

88 (A) Is owned by the District of Columbia and operated by the Office of Social
89 Housing Development;
90 (B) Provides mixed-income apartment housing that is permanently affordable for
91 lower income tenants; and
92 (C) Uses the revenue generated from rent to further the purpose and duties of The
93 Office of Social Housing Development pursuant to section 103 of this Act.
94 (16) “Street-level” means the portion of a property that sits on or most proximately opens
95 to the same level as the street or sidewalk. “Street-level” may also be considered ground floor or
96 ground level.
97 (17) “Tenant” means a tenant, subtenant, lessee, sublessee, or other person entitled to the
98 possession, occupancy or benefits of a rental unit within a social housing development. The
99 singular term “tenant” includes the plural.
100 (18) “Tenant association” means:
101 (A) A group of tenants organized to represent their collective interests as residents
102 of social housing developments;
103 (B) An association that represent a minimum of 51% of the households in a
104 building, as determined by rules established by the tenant association pursuant to section 106(b);
105 and
106 (C) the term “tenant association” may also include a tenant union, tenant
107 organization, tenant council, or similar term reflecting the chosen name of a duly organized
108 group of tenants of a social housing development.
109 (19) “Universal design” means creating a built environment to be accessible and usable to
110 the greatest number of people regardless of ability, age, or other characteristics.
4

111 (20) “Utility provider” means a provider of services for electricity, water, and
112 telecommunications and internet.
113 (21) “Very low income” means a household income equal to between 31% and 50% of
114 the area median income.
115 Sec. 102. Office of Social Housing Development Establishment.
116 (a)(1) Pursuant to section 404(b) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
117 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.04(b)), the Council establishes an
118 Office of Social Housing Development (“The Office”) as a subordinate office within the
119 executive branch of the District government.
120 (2) The Office shall be under the direction and agency cluster of the Deputy
121 Mayor for Planning and Economic Development.
122 (b) The purpose of The Office is:
123 (1) The development, construction, conversion, retention, operation, and
124 maintenance of District-owned real property to generate permanently affordable, well-
125 maintained mixed-income rental housing accommodations (“social housing developments”) that
126 meet high environmental standards for District residents;
127 (2) The conversion of District-owned land into social housing developments; and
128 (3) The cultivation of street-level commercial tenant amenities that serve a public
129 purpose at all properties developed by The Office pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this
130 subsection where properties are zoned for mixed-use.
131 (c) The Office shall be headed by a Director, who shall be appointed by the Mayor with
132 the advice and consent of the Council pursuant to section 2(a) of the Confirmation Act of 1978,
133 effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(a)).
5

134 (d)(1) The Mayor shall establish a board (“Board”) to govern the operations of The
135 Office which shall consist of 9 residents of the District of Columbia with the following
136 qualifications:
137 (A) Two members shall have expertise in the financing or development of
138 affordable housing for extremely low-income households;
139 (B) One member shall have expertise in the management or operation of
140 affordable housing for extremely low-income households;
141 (C) Two members shall have expertise in housing law, legal services, or
142 tenant organizing; and
143 (D) Four members shall be elected by tenants of social housing
144 developments to serve as tenant-representatives to the Board.
145 (2) Board members shall serve three-year terms and vacancies shall be filled
146 within 90 days of a board member departure.
147 (3) The Board shall establish bylaws to govern their operations, leadership, and
148 meeting procedures.
149 (4) With input from the Director, The Office and the social housing coordinating
150 council established in section 103(b), The Board shall create key performance indicators and
151 development goals for new social housing developments which shall be shared with the Council
152 of the District of Columbia and with tenant association leadership board on an annual basis.
153 (5) Board members shall participate in annual trainings related to:
154 (A) The role of the governing body of a District office;
155 (B) District government ethics;
6

156 (C) Background on major District and federal housing programs and
157 financing opportunities; and
158 (D) Fair housing, reasonable accommodations, and non-discrimination.
159 (6) Meeting of the Board shall be subject to the requirements of the Open
160 Meetings Amendment Act of 2010, effective March 31, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-350; D.C. Official
161 Code § 2-571 et seq.).
162 (e)(1) The Mayor shall dedicate start-up funding for the Office which shall be sufficient
163 for not less than 15 full-time employees, office space in a District government building,
164 employee technology, and office supplies.
165 (2) The District’s General Funds shall be used to supplement operational funding
166 for The Office until such time as the Social Housing Development Fund established pursuant to
167 section 104 is self-sustaining for purposes of paying staff salaries and Office operations utilizing
168 not more than 3% rent cumulatively generated by tenants of social housing developments.
169 (f) Beginning, October 1, 2027, and annually through October 1, 2032, the Mayor shall
170 dedicate not less than 10% of the Housing Production Trust Fund to the Office of Social Housing
171 Development as a developer fee to carry out the duties of The Office as described in section 103.
172 Sec. 103. Duties and Authority of the Office of Social Housing Development.
173 (a) The duties of The Office shall be as follows:
174 (1) Develop, manage, and maintain permanently affordable, mixed-income rental
175 housing accommodations where tenant rent deposited into the Social Housing Development
176 Fund established pursuant to section 104 of this title shall be used to fund some or all of the
177 following purposes:
7

178 (A) Property management of social housing developments, including any
179 contracts for property management and related sub-contracted services;
180 (B) Regular maintenance of social housing developments, including any
181 contracts or sub-contracts for property maintenance, repair, or renovations;
182 (C) Security personnel and systems at social housing developments,
183 including any contracts for security services,;
184 (D) Tenant association and tenant governance-related expenses required
185 pursuant to Section 106 of this title;
186 (E) Contractor training-related expenses required pursuant to Section 107
187 of this title; and
188 (F) Office of Social Housing Development overhead operations, provided
189 that not more than 3% of rents deposited into the Social Housing Development Fund may be
190 used to defray the following costs:
191 (i) Employee salaries and benefits;
192 (ii) Government office space;
193 (iii) Office supplies and devices;
194 (iv) Website development, technology, and other IT services; and
195 (v) Other reasonable expenses necessary to facilitate general Office
196 operations;
197 (2) Leverage rent revenue generated in excess of an amount necessary to cover
198 expenses listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection for the following purposes:
199 (A) Establishing capital and operating reserve funds which may be used to
200 finance emergency maintenance or repairs, among other expenses;
8

201 (B) Building real property social housing developments on District-owned
202 land;
203 (C) Acquiring new real property for the purpose of creating a social
204 housing development; and
205 (D) Renovating real property, including retrofitting properties to achieve
206 compliance with Section 109 of this Act, for the purpose of developing social housing;
207 (3) Develop and administer a centralized tenant application process to facilitate
208 leasing at all social housing developments. The application process shall:
209 (A) Be available online and as a paper copy at a centralized leasing office;
210 (B) Use plain language and be made available in all languages requiredby
211 section 4 of the Language Access Act of 2004, effective June 19, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-167; D.C.
212 Official Code 2-1933);
213 (C) Utilize best practices in application design to limit implicit bias in
214 tenant selection and comply with all housing non-discrimination provisions set forth in The
215 Human Rights Act of 1977, effective December 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 2-38; 31 D.C. Official Code
216 § 2-1401.01 et seq.);
217 (D) Not require an application or processing fee; and
218 (E) Provide prospective tenants with regular updates on the status of their
219 application;
220 (4) Pursuant to The Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980, effective
221 September 10, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-86; D.C. Official Code § 42-3401 et seq.), convert privately-
222 owned real property into social housing developments utilizing for following provisions:
9

223 (A) The Tenant Opportunity to Purchase Act (“TOPA”) of 1980 when
224 tenant organizations elect to assign TOPA rights to the District under section 406 of the Act
225 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3404.06); or
226 (B) The District’s Opportunity to Purchase Amendment Act of 2008,
227 effective December 24, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-286; D.C. Official Code § 42-3404.31 et seq)
228 (“DOPA”);
229 (5) Apply for federal, local, or private government grants and loans including the
230 Housing Production Trust Fund, the Green Finance Authority, and the Affordable Housing
231 Preservation Fund, and use the proceeds thereof to acquire, develop, and preserve mixed-income,
232 permanently affordable social housing developments; provided, that the Office shall not borrow
233 any funds or incur any loans or other indebtedness unless such indebtedness has been authorized
234 in advance by an act of the Council and evidenced by a revenue bond, note, or obligation issued
235 pursuant to paragraph (6) of this subsection or other District law;
236 (6) Request the Council to authorize by act in accordance with section 490(a)(1)
237 of the Home Rule Act, effective December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 809; D.C. Official Code
238 § 1-204.90(a)(1)), the issuance of revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations to finance capital
239 projects or undertakings relating to social housing, with all such obligations payable solely from
240 and secured solely by the pledged revenues of the Office; provided, that no real property shall be
241 mortgaged or pledged as security for such obligations;
242 (7) Possess an ownership interest in an entity formed for the purpose of financing
243 a capital project related to housing with federal tax credits such as Low-Income Housing Tax
244 Credits and New Markets Tax Credits;
10

245 (8)(A) Hire and supervise, with the advice and consent of tenant association
246 leadership boards, property management, including management provided through a contracted
247 company, to oversee the day-to-day operations of social housing developments owned by The
248 Office.
249 (B)The Office may provide or contract for maintenance, security, or other
250 services at social housing developments if such services are not facilitated through property
251 management.
252 (9) Enter into contracts and facilitate relationships necessary to carry out training
253 requirements pursuant to sections 106 and 107 of this title;
254 (10) Execute ground lease agreements for street-level commercial space, except
255 where prohibited by zoning regulations, to provide community amenities for a public purpose
256 pursuant to Section 108; and
257 (11) Enter into an agreement with the Office of the Chief Technology Officer to
258 provide for free DC Wifi connectivity and access at all social housing developments.
259 (b)(1) The Director of the Office of Social Housing Development shall establish and
260 sustain a social housing coordinating council to support the creation, maintenance, and tenant
261 governance of social housing developments.
262 (2) The social housing coordinating council shall include representatives of:
263 (A) District government housing agencies;
264 (B) Non-profit housing developers and providers;
265 (C) Local tenant rights organizations;
266 (D) Each social housing development tenant association leadership board;
11

267 (E) Social housing developments who do not currently serve on the tenant
268 association leadership board of their property; and
269 (F) Local green building and environmental justice organizations.
270 (3) The coordinating council shall meet not less than bi-monthly and meetings
271 shall be publicized to all social housing tenants.
272 (4) Meeting of the social housing coordinating council shall be subject to
273 the requirements of the Open Meetings Amendment Act of 2010, effective March 31, 2011
274 (D.C. Law 18-350; D.C. Official Code § 2-571 et seq.)
275 Sec. 104. Social Housing Development Fund.
276 (a) There is established as a special fund the Social Housing Development Fund
277 ("Fund"), which shall be administered by The Office of Social Housing Development. The
278 purpose of the Fund is to:
279 (1) Finance the creation of social housing developments;
280 (2) Manage federal, local, or private government grants, loans, and bonds
281 received to pay or finance costs of constructing, designing, developing, acquiring, renovating, or
282 equipping capital facilities of social housing developments;
283 (3) Collect and manage rent from residential and commercial or institutional
284 tenants of social housing developments;
285 (4) Pay for services related to tenant governance and property management
286 pursuant to sections 106 and 107 of this Act;
287 (5) Pay for administrative costs of the Office of Social Housing Development,
288 provided that not more than 3% of rents collected pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection
289 may be used to defray these costs; and
12

290 (6) Establish and manage capital and operating reserves to carry out fiduciary
291 responsibilities of the Office.
292 (b) Monies obtained pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited into the
293 Fund and shall not revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of
294 Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, nor be diverted to any fund of the District at any other time.
295 The Office may create accounts within the Fund.
296 Sec. 105. Residential Characteristics of Social Housing Developments.
297 (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, when the Office of Social
298 Housing Development develops real property, the building’s residential development shall
299 include the following:
300 (1) Not less than 30% of apartment units constructed with three, or more, bedrooms;
301 (2) Not less than 30% of apartment units constructed with two bedrooms;
302 (3) Universal design standards; and
303 (4) When street-level commercial office space is not available, one, or more, apartment
304 units shall be designed and dedicated as office space for providers of case management or counseling
305 services associated with District housing and economic security programs.
306 (b)(1) When the Office of Social Housing Development acquires real property through a
307 TOPA or DOPA process pursuant to The Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980,
308 effective September 10, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-86; D.C. Official Code § 42-3401.01 et seq.), at such
309 time when the building requires a substantial renovation, the Office shall produce a renovation
310 plan to generate redevelopment of multi-bedroom units in an amount equal to or greater than the
311 number of multi-bedroom units in the existing building.
312 (2) The Office shall guarantee a right to return to all tenants who wish to move
313 back to a renovated property.
13

314 (3) The Office shall engage the tenant association leadership board in
315 redevelopment planning processes to ensure the right to return and equitable development of
316 multi-bedroom units is achieved through renovations.
317 (c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, when the Office of Social
318 Housing Development develops real property, each social housing development shall initially
319 rent apartment units according to the following distribution:
320 (1) Not less than 30% of tenant households shall, at the time of application, be
321 considered extremely low-income;
322 (2) Not less than 30% of tenant households shall, at the time of application, be
323 considered very low or low income; and
324 (3) Not more than 40% of units shall be leased to households who shall agree to
325 pay a fair market value in monthly rent.
326 (d) When the Office of Social Housing Development acquires real property through a
327 TOPA or DOPA process pursuant to The Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980,
328 effective September 10, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-86; D.C. Official Code § 42-3401.01 et seq.), new
329 rents shall be set according to annual household income such that no tenant household is paying
330 more than 30% of their income in rent.
331 (e) When a tenant moves out of a social housing development, the Office shall fill the
332 vacant unit according to the distribution requirements and housing preference bonus
333 considerations set forth in subsections (c)(1)-(3) and (f) of this section.
334 (f) In evaluating tenant applications for social housing units, the Office shall assign a
335 25% housing preference bonus to prospective tenants who, at the time of application, are
336 employed or are beginning employment in one of the following professional sectors:
14

337 (1) Education, including early childhood education, Pre-kindergarten to 12th grade
338 instruction, higher education, out-of-school time programming, and educational administration;
339 (2) Health, including nursing, mental health care, home health assistance, and
340 emergency medical services; or
341 (3) Case management or direct service professions.
342 (g)(1) A tenant of a social housing development property who, at the time of their initial
343 lease agreement, is considered extremely-, very-, or low-income, shall never pay more than 30%
344 of their monthly income in rent.
345 (2) the Office of Social Housing Development shall certify a tenant’s household
346 income on an annual basis to determine their monthly rent rate;
347 (3) If a tenant’s income is reduced or disrupted mid-year, a tenant may present
348 their situation to The Office to request a temporary reduction in rent to match 30% of their new
349 income level until the time of annual recertification, provided that a rent adjustment shall not be
350 granted below $250 per month.
351 (h) The Office of Social Housing Development shall not increase residential rent:
352 (1) More than once annually;
353 (2) Without 60-days advance written notice; or
354 (3) More than the average of the Consumer Price Index for the Washington-
355 Baltimore Metropolitan Statistical Area for all-urban consumers published by the Department of
356 Labor, or any successor index, as of the close of the 12-month period ending on November 30 of
357 such year.
358 Sec. 106. Tenant Governance and Rights.
15

359 (a) The Office of Social Housing Development and the Coordinating Council shall
360 support the tenants of all District social housing developments to establish and maintain tenant
361 association leadership boards to represent the best interests of residents living at each respective
362 social housing property.
363 (b) Tenant association leadership boards shall be responsible for the following duties at
364 each social housing development property:
365 (1) Establish tenant association by-laws and a process by which residents will
366 elect leadership which is representative of the full population of tenants at the property;
367 (2) Establish and maintain community rules and expectations;
368 (3) Review Office of Social Housing Development contract agreements, when
369 applicable, and provide ongoing feedback related to property management;
370 (4) Advocate on behalf of tenants for improved property management, when
371 necessary;
372 (5) Initiate a process with The Office to procure a new contract for building
373 management if a majority of the tenant association leadership board finds a current company’s
374 performance unsatisfactory;
375 (6) Conduct tenant association feedback processes to determine community needs
376 and preferences related to a social housing development’s leasable street-level commercial or
377 institutional space; and
378 (7) Manage a budget for community-building and other initiatives that advance
379 the mission of the tenant association.
380 (c) Tenant association leadership board meetings shall:
381 (1) Be open to all tenant residents to attend;
16

382 (2) Be publicized, in matters determined by the tenant association leadership
383 board, at least 3 business days in advance of each meeting;
384 (3) Produce for tenants the Office copies of notes or recordings within one week
385 of each meeting;
386 (4) Record all discussions and votes related to the initiation of a new contract for
387 property management services; and
388 (5) Arrange for translation services upon request.
389 (d)(1) Tenant association leadership boards shall receive annual trainings, arranged by
390 The Office of Social Housing Development, in residential property management and board
391 governance.
392 (2) The Office shall facilitate a relationship between each social housing
393 development and the Office of Tenant Advocate and the Office of Tenant Advocate shall serve
394 as a primary tenant-rights resource for tenants of the development.
395 (3) Tenant association leadership boards may use board-managed funds to seek
396 support or technical assistance from non-governmental housing law, tenant organizing, or other
397 expert resources to exercise their rights and execute their duties.
398 (e)(1) Pursuant to subsection (b)(7) of this section, tenant association leadership boards
399 shall be provided with a budget equivalent to 1.5% of the cumulative annual rent collected at
400 their respective social housing development properties.
401 (2) the Office of Social Housing Development shall establish and facilitate access
402 to bank accounts for tenant association leadership boards for each property.
403 (f)(1) All tenants of social housing shall be afforded opportunities for restorative justice
404 conflict resolution when conflict or harm arise between tenants or between a tenant and the
17

405 Office of Social Housing Development or any entities contracted by The Office to work with a
406 social housing property.
407 (2) The Office of Social Housing Development shall facilitate a relationship with
408 organizations or consultants to provide annual restorative justice training on conflict resolution;
409 training shall be made available to all tenants of social housing developments.
410 (g)(1) The Office of Social Housing Development shall provide notice to all tenants of
411 their right to apply for Emergency Rental Assistance to cure rental arrears if they meet the
412 qualifications of Section 8f of the Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, effective October 22,
413 2005 (D.C. Law 16-35; D.C. Official Code § 4-753.08).
414 (2) Notice shall be posted publicly in a property’s common area and provided to
415 tenants:
416 (A) In writing, electronically or printed, at the time the property manager
417 or The Office learns of a tenant’s inability to pay rent, and there shall be a rebuttable
418 presumption that failure to pay rent by the property’s prescribed monthly deadline constitutes a
419 tenant’s inability to pay rent that month;
420 (B) In the language the property manager or The Office know to be the
421 tenant’s primary language; and
422 (C) 60 days or more before the Office moves to initiate an eviction
423 proceeding on account of nonpayment of rent.
424 (3) Notice shall include contact information for the Department of Human
425 Services and the Landlord-Tenant Legal Assistance Network.
426 (h)(1) The Office of Social Housing Development shall work with tenant association
427 leadership boards and property management companies to produce biannual reports on each
18

428 development’s finances, expenditures, revenues, unit vacancy and turnover rates, maintenance
429 and security contracts, property repairs executed and needs, projected rent adjustments,
430 commercial tenant agreements, and other major property management issues identified tenant
431 association leadership boards.
432 (2) The report shall be provided electronically to all tenants and posted on the
433 website of The Office .
434 (3) A tenant may request a report copy be provided to them as a paper copy.
435 Sec. 107. Responsibilities of Social Housing Property Management.
436 (a) The Office of Social Housing Development may:
437 (1) Establish a division in their Office to serve as the onsite manager of day-to-day
438 operations of social housing properties; or
439 (2) Contract with a private company to provide day-to-day property management
440 operations at one or multiple social housing properties.
441 (b) Providing day-to-day property management operations shall include:
442 (1) Monitoring building operations and communicating updates to tenants
443 including establishing a process to receive regular tenant and tenant association leadership board
444 feedback on building operations;
445 (2) Ensuring proactive building maintenance and timely unit repairs, including:
446 (A) Responding, in writing, to a tenant maintenance complaint or repair
447 request not later than two business days after a tenant files a complaint or request;
448 (B) Making a reasonable effort to complete all maintenance and repair
449 requests within one week of receiving the request; and
450 (C) Providing a tenant a weekly status update on how an issue is being
451 resolved, if the issue remains unresolved after one week;
19

452 (3) Accurately collecting rent on behalf of the Office of Social Housing
453 Development Fund which shall transferred to The Fund in a timely manner;
454 (4) Providing or executing contracts with vendors for the following services:
455 (A) Regular cleaning services for building common areas;
456 (B) Regular maintenance for building upkeep and pest management;
457 (C) Emergency maintenance and construction repairs;
458 (D) Trash, recycling, compost, and other waste removal services;
459 (E) Security personnel and systems; and
460 (F) Landscaping services;
461 (5) Entering agreements with and making payments to utility providers for in-unit
462 and common space utility usage per social housing development property; and
463 (6) Facilitating restorative justice conflict resolution processes when a dispute
464 arises between a tenant or tenants and the property manager or any vendor contracted by
465 property management.
466 (c)(1) When a contract is executed with a private company to provide property
467 management, The Office shall require all company employees who will be working at or with
468 social housing properties to:
469 (A) Participate in implicit bias and anti-racism training; and
470 (B) Participate in restorative justice conflict resolution training.
471 (2) Employees working at or with social housing properties shall participate in
472 trainings annually, including attending trainings within two months of beginning a job with a
473 social housing property.
20

474 (3) The Office shall arrange for and fund anti-bias and conflict resolution
475 trainings.
476 Sec. 108. Community Amenities for a Public Purpose at Social Housing Developments.
477 (a)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), when constructing a new building as a social
478 housing development, the Office of Social Housing Development shall set aside not less than
479 50% of the street-level floorplan as commercial space to meet a public purpose.
480 (2) The requirement set forth in paragraph (1) may be waived if a new property is
481 not being constructed in a location zoned for mixed-use and no zoning adjustments will be
482 pursued by the Office.
483 (b) When the Office of Social Housing Development acquires real property through a
484 TOPA or DOPA process pursuant to The Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980,
485 effective September 10, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-86; D.C. Official Code § 42-3401.01 et seq.) and a
486 previous building structure included street-level commercial space, the Office of Social Housing
487 Development shall preserve not less than 75% of pre-existing commercial space for community
488 amenities that meet a public purpose.
489 (c) Community amenities that meet a public purpose include:
490 (1) Libraries;
491 (2) Community or recreation centers;
492 (3) Grocery stores or healthy food markets;
493 (4) Child development facilities, out-of-school time programs, or other
494 educational entities;
495 (5) Health clinics or other public health and wellness-related services;
496 (6) Career development and job training services;
21

497 (7) Non-profit offices or programs;
498 (8) Small-business or artistic community incubators;
499 (9) Flexible meeting rooms or office space for:
500 (A) Neighborhood organizations such as Advisory Neighborhood
501 Committees or civic associations;
502 (B) “Pop-up” programming that meets community needs identified by
503 tenants of a social housing development; or
504 (C) Case management services affiliated with District government housing
505 and economic security programs; and
506 (10) Businesses that advance environmental causes.
507 (d)(1) Lessees or renters of ground-floor commercial space may be the District
508 government, non-profit entities, or private businesses.
509 (2) When leasing ground-floor commercial space to non-governmental entities,
510 the Office of Social Housing Development shall charge rents at not more than 80% of fair market
511 rental rates for comparable neighborhood street-level retail space.
512 (3) The Office shall not raise rents for commercial lessees more than once in a
513 two-year period.
514 (4) When adjusting rental rates or renegotiating a lease with an existing street-
515 level retail tenant, the Office shall not raise rent above the average of the Consumer Price Index
516 for the Washington-Baltimore Metropolitan Statistical Area for all-urban consumers published
517 by the Department of Labor, or any successor index, as of the close of the 12-month period
518 ending on November 30 of such year. .
22

519 (5) A new lessee for street-level commercial space in a social housing
520 development shall not be charged more than 5% more than a previous lessee.
521 (f)(1) The Department of General Services shall facilitate property maintenance and
522 security for any government facilities or services operating or co-locating at a social housing
523 development.
524 (2) The Office of Social Housing Development or their contracted property
525 manager shall execute maintenance contracts necessary for regular and emergency maintenance
526 needs of non-governmental street-level commercial space lessees.
527 (3) Storefront security systems, such as alarms, CCTV cameras, door lock
528 protocols, and retail product security, shall be the responsibility of non-governmental street-level
529 commercial lessees operating at a social housing development. These responsibilities shall not
530 dimmish the requirement of the Office or their contracted property manager to provide or
531 procure contracts for security personnel and systems for the social housing development
532 complex.
533 Sec. 109. Environmental Standards at Social Housing Developments.
534 (a) When constructed or renovated, social housing developments shall meet high
535 environmental standards, including:
536 (1) Net-zero emissions, including no energy from combustion or any sources that
537 emit greenhouse gases;
538 (2) High-efficiency, all-electric heating and cooling systems;
539 (3) Energy-efficient or high-efficiency appliances, windows, and lights in all
540 apartment units and common spaces;
23

541 (4) On-site solar energy production to the maximum extent practicable, including
542 using the District’s solar installation program and employing labor through the District’s solar
543 installation workforce training programs;
544 (5) Eco-friendly landscape architecture, including green walls and green roofs, to
545 maximize natural cooling;
546 (6) Low-flow toilets, smart shower and washing machine technologies, and rain
547 capture and recycling techniques to reduce water waste;
548 (7) On-site composting services;
549 (8) On-site electric vehicle and electric bike charging ports that are accessible to
550 tenants and to the public;
551 (9) Indoor facilities to lock and store bicycles and other personal mobility devices;
552 and
553 (10) To the extent that on-site parking is developed or available at a social
554 housing development, not less than 20% of parking spaces shall be reserved for agreements with
555 car-sharing services.
556 (b) Social housing developments shall not include the following:
557 (1) Natural gas for heating, hot water, or cooking; or
558 (2) Off-street parking in excess of zoning regulations.
559 Sec. 110. Labor Standards and Employment Generation for Social Housing.
560 (a) Social housing developments shall be developed in compliance with federal and
561 District law, including:
562 (1) Procurement laws pursuant to Subchapter VI of Chapter 3A of Title 2;
24

563 (2) First source employment laws pursuant to Subchapter X of Chapter 2 of Title
564 2;
565 (3) Small and local business enterprise development laws pursuant to Subchapter
566 IX-A of Chapter 2 of Title 2;
567 (4) Clean Hands requirements pursuant to Subchapter II of Chapter 28 of Title 47;
568 (5) Whistleblower protections pursuant to Subchapter XII of Chapter 2 of Title 2;
569 and
570 (6) Prevailing wage requirements pursuant to the Davis-Bacon Act of 1931,
571 approved March 3, 1931 (46 Stat. 1494; 40 U.S.C. § 3141 et seq.).
572 (b)(1) In order to advance the Office of Social Housing Development’s authority to
573 manage social housing properties established under section 107(a)(1), the Office may develop a
574 job training program for professions related to property management, including day-to-day
575 building operations, maintenance, and security services.
576 (2) To the extent practicable, the Office of Social Housing Development shall hire
577 tenants to work the following jobs at properties under the Office’s management:
578 (A) Front desk attendants and site managers;
579 (B) Leasing office associates;
580 (C) Security;
581 (D) Property maintenance and repair; and
582 (E) Landscape management and groundskeeping.
583 (c) When The Office procures a contract related to the development, construction, or
584 operation of social housing, the Office shall assign the equivalent of a 25% preference bonus for
585 companies whose workforce is unionized or who subcontract for union labor.
25

586 Sec. 111. Rules.
587 The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
588 approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules
589 to implement the provisions of this title.
590
591 Title II: CONFORMING AMENDMENTS.
592 Sec. 201. Section 301(q) of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
593 Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-
594 603.01(17)), is amended as follows:
595 (a) Paragraph (56) is amended by striking the word "and" at the end.
596 (b) Paragraph (57) is amended by striking the phrase "District of Columbia Public
597 Schools." and inserting the phrase "District of Columbia Public Schools; and" in its place.
598 (c) A new paragraph (58) is added to read as follows:
599 "(58) Office of Social Housing Development.".
600 Sec. 202. Section 301(b) of the Green Finance Authority Establishment Act of 2018,
601 effective August 22, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-155; D.C. Official Code § 8-173.31(b)) is amended by
602 striking the period and inserting the phrase “including Social Housing Development as defined
603 pursuant to Title I of the Housing Development Growth Amendment Act of 2025, introduced
604 March __, 2025 (B2-___).”
605 Sec. 203. Section 1(a-1)(2)(A) of An Act Authorizing the sale of certain real estate in the
606 District of Columbia no longer required for public purposes, approved August 5, 1939 (53 Stat.
607 1211; D.C. Official Code § 10-801(a-1)(2)(A)), is amended to read as follows:
26

608 “(A) Whether the real property could have any use by the District,
609 including:
610 “(i) A description of the District’s current needs for real property,
611 “(ii) A description of potential public uses considered by the
612 Mayor,
613 “(iii) The square footage of green space on the real property,
614 “(iv) A narrative explaining why the real property is unsuited for
615 each public use considered; and
616 “(v) If the property is being disposed of in order to provide
617 affordable housing, a justification and mathematical assessment such as a pro forma for why the
618 proposed disposition will result in more permanently affordable housing for extremely low- and
619 very low-income households than would be created if the property were converted into a social
620 housing development as defined pursuant to Title I of the Housing Development Growth
621 Amendment Act of 2025, introduced March __, 2025 (B26-___).”.
622 Sec. 204. The Housing Production Trust Fund Act of 1988, effective March 16, 1989
623 (D.C. Law 7-202; D.C. Official Code § 42-2801 et seq.), is amended as follows:
624 (a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 42–2801) is amended by adding a new paragraph (13)
625 to read as follows:
626 “(13) “Social Housing Development” shall have the same meaning as section
627 101(15) of the Housing Development Growth Amendment Act of 2025, introduced March __,
628 2025 (B26-___).”..
629 (b) Section 3(b) (D.C. Official Code § 42–2802(b)) is amended by adding a new
630 paragraph (12) to read as follows:
27

631 “(12) Funds for the Office of Social Housing Development to acquire, develop, or
632 preserve a social housing development.”
633 Sec. 205. The Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980, effective September 10,
634 1980 (D.C. Law 3-86; D.C. Official Code § 42-3404 et seq.), is amended as follows:
635 (a) Section 406 (D.C. Official Code § 42–3404.06) is amended by striking the phrase “or
636 governmental.” and inserting the phrase “or governmental, including to the District Office of
637 Social Housing Development established pursuant to Title I of the Housing Development
638 Growth Amendment Act of 2025, introduced March __, 2025 (B26-___).” in its place.
639 (b) Section 431 (D. C. Official Code § 42–3404.31) is amended by adding a new
640 subsection (b-1) to read as follows:
641 “(b-1) If the Mayor assigns the District’s purchasing rights pursuant to § 42-3404.36,
642 they must first issue a justification and mathematical assessment such as a pro forma for why
643 doing so will create more permanently affordable housing for extremely low- and very low-
644 income households than converting it into a social housing development as defined pursuant to
645 Title I of the Housing Amendment Act of 2025, introduced March __, 2025 (B26-___).”.
646
647 TITLE III. FISCAL IMPACT STATEMENT; APPLICABILITY; EFFECTIVE DATE.
648 Sec. 301. Applicability.
649 (a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
650 budget and financial plan.
651 (b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
652 an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
653 of the certification.
28

654 (c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
655 the District of Columbia Register.
656 (2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
657 applicability of this act.
658 Sec. 302. Fiscal impact statement.
659 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
660 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
661 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ 1-301.47a).
662 Sec. 303. Effective date.
663 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
664 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
665 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
666 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
667 Columbia Register.
29